Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 4. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 08.71.200.
Contact lenses.

Contact lenses shall be fitted in conjunction with and under the supervision of a licensed physician or an optometrist and with a written contact-lens prescription showing that the prescription may be filled for contact lenses and requiring that the patient return to see the prescribing physician or optometrist.
In no case may contact lenses be prepared by neutralizing a person’s eyeglasses or spectacles.

History.

(§ 1 ch 45 SLA 1973)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as part of AS 08.71.210, which is now AS

08.71.240

. Renumbered in 1973.